New York, session 2025-2026, A8506.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1180-h to read as follows: 3 § 1180-h. Owner liability for failure of the operator to comply with 4 certain posted maximum speed limits; village of Quogue, town of South- 5 ampton, county of Suffolk. (a) 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of 6 law, the village of Quogue, in the town of Southampton, county of 7 Suffolk is hereby authorized to establish a demonstration program impos- 8 ing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an oper- 9 ator thereof to comply with posted maximum speed limits on any road in 10 such village in accordance with the provisions of this section. Such 11 village, for purposes of the implementation of the demonstration 12 program, shall operate photo speed violation monitoring systems within 13 such village at no more than five locations at any one time during any 14 year of such program. Such photo speed violation monitoring systems may 15 be stationary or mobile and shall be activated at locations selected by 16 such village. Such photo speed violation monitoring systems shall be 17 placed at locations based on criteria, including but not limited to 18 whether the location is within a quarter mile of a school, speeding 19 data, accident history, proximity to facilities for senior citizens or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13041-05-5 A. 8506--A 2 1 disabled persons, roadway geometry and equitable geographic distrib- 2 ution. 3 2. No photo speed violation monitoring system shall be used in a 4 village authorized to establish a demonstration program pursuant to this 5 section unless (i) on the day it is to be used it has successfully 6 passed a self-test of its functions; and (ii) it has undergone an annual 7 calibration check performed pursuant to paragraph four of this subdivi- 8 sion. The village shall install signs giving notice that a photo speed 9 violation monitoring system is in use to be mounted on advance warning 10 signs notifying motor vehicle operators of such upcoming speed zone 11 and/or on speed limit signs applicable within such speed zone, in 12 conformance with standards established in the MUTCD. 13 3. Operators of photo speed violation monitoring systems shall have 14 completed training in the procedures for setting up, testing, and oper- 15 ating such systems. Each such operator shall complete and sign a daily 16 set-up log for each such system that the village operates that (i) 17 states the date and time when, and the location where, the system was 18 set up that day, and (ii) states that such operator successfully 19 performed, and the system passed, the self-tests of such system before 20 producing a recorded image that day. The village shall retain each such 21 daily log until the later of the date on which the photo speed violation 22 monitoring system to which it applies has been permanently removed from 23 use or the final resolution of all cases involving notices of liability 24 issued based on photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other 25 recorded images produced by such system. 26 4. Each photo speed violation monitoring system shall undergo an annu- 27 al calibration check performed by an independent calibration laboratory 28 which shall issue a signed certificate of calibration. The village shall 29 keep each such annual certificate of calibration on file until the final 30 resolution of all cases involving a notice of liability issued during 31 such year which were based on photographs, microphotographs, videotape 32 or other recorded images produced by such photo speed violation monitor- 33 ing system. 34 5. (i) Such demonstration programs shall utilize necessary technolo- 35 gies to ensure, to the extent practicable, that photographs, microphoto- 36 graphs, videotape or other recorded images produced by such photo speed 37 violation monitoring systems shall not include images that identify the 38 driver, the passengers, or the contents of the vehicle. Provided, howev- 39 er, that no notice of liability issued pursuant to this section shall be 40 dismissed solely because such a photograph, microphotograph, videotape 41 or other recorded image allows for the identification of the driver, the 42 passengers, or the contents of vehicles where the village shows that it 43 made reasonable efforts to comply with the provisions of this paragraph 44 in such case. 45 (ii) Photographs, microphotographs, videotape or any other recorded 46 image from a photo speed violation monitoring system shall be for the 47 exclusive use of the village for the purpose of the adjudication of 48 liability imposed pursuant to this section and of the owner receiving a 49 notice of liability pursuant to this section, and shall be destroyed by 50 the village upon the final resolution of the notice of liability to 51 which such photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded 52 images relate, or one year following the date of issuance of such notice 53 of liability, whichever is later. Notwithstanding the provisions of any 54 other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, photographs, microphoto- 55 graphs, videotape or any other recorded image from a photo speed 56 violation monitoring system shall not be open to the public, nor subject A. 8506--A 3 1 to civil or criminal process or discovery, nor used by any court or 2 administrative or adjudicatory body in any action or proceeding therein 3 except that which is necessary for the adjudication of a notice of 4 liability issued pursuant to this section, and no public entity or 5 employee, officer or agent thereof shall disclose such information, 6 except that such photographs, microphotographs, videotape or any other 7 recorded images from such systems: 8 (A) shall be available for inspection and copying and use by the motor 9 vehicle owner and operator for so long as such photographs, microphoto- 10 graphs, videotape or other recorded images are required to be maintained 11 or are maintained by such public entity, employee, officer or agent; and 12 (B) (1) shall be furnished when described in a search warrant issued 13 by a court authorized to issue such a search warrant pursuant to article 14 six hundred ninety of the criminal procedure law or a federal court 15 authorized to issue such a search warrant under federal law, where such 16 search warrant states that there is reasonable cause to believe such 17 information constitutes evidence of, or tends to demonstrate that, a 18 misdemeanor or felony offense was committed in this state or another 19 state, or that a particular person participated in the commission of a 20 misdemeanor or felony offense in this state or another state, provided, 21 however, that if such offense was against the laws of another state, the 22 court shall only issue a warrant if the conduct comprising such offense 23 would, if occurring in this state, constitute a misdemeanor or felony 24 against the laws of this state; and 25 (2) shall be furnished in response to a subpoena duces tecum signed by 26 a judge of competent jurisdiction and issued pursuant to article six 27 hundred ten of the criminal procedure law or a judge or magistrate of a 28 federal court authorized to issue such a subpoena duces tecum under 29 federal law, where the judge finds and the subpoena states that there is 30 reasonable cause to believe such information is relevant and material to 31 the prosecution, or the defense, or the investigation by an authorized 32 law enforcement official, of the alleged commission of a misdemeanor or 33 felony in this state or another state, provided, however, that if such 34 offense was against the laws of another state, such judge or magistrate 35 shall only issue such subpoena if the conduct comprising such offense 36 would, if occurring in this state, constitute a misdemeanor or felony in 37 this state; and 38 (3) may, if lawfully obtained pursuant to this clause and clause (A) 39 of this subparagraph and otherwise admissible, be used in such criminal 40 action or proceeding. 41 (b) Where the village of Quogue has established a demonstration 42 program pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section, the owner of a 43 vehicle shall be liable for a penalty imposed pursuant to this section 44 if such vehicle was used or operated with the permission of the owner, 45 express or implied, in violation of subdivision (c) or (d) of section 46 eleven hundred eighty of this article, and such violation is evidenced 47 by information obtained from a photo speed violation monitoring system; 48 provided however that no owner of a vehicle shall be liable for a penal- 49 ty imposed pursuant to this section where the operator of such vehicle 50 has been convicted of the underlying violation of subdivision (c) or (d) 51 of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. 52 (c) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the 53 following meanings: 54 1. "manual on uniform traffic control devices" or "MUTCD" shall mean 55 the manual and specifications for a uniform system of traffic control A. 8506--A 4 1 devices maintained by the commissioner of transportation pursuant to 2 section sixteen hundred eighty of this chapter; 3 2. "owner" shall have the meaning provided in article two-B of this 4 chapter; and 5 3. "photo speed violation monitoring system" shall mean a vehicle 6 sensor installed to work in conjunction with a speed measuring device 7 which automatically produces two or more photographs, two or more micro- 8 photographs, a videotape or other recorded images of each vehicle at the 9 time it is used or operated in a speed zone in violation of subdivision 10 (c) or (d) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article in accord- 11 ance with the provisions of this section. 12 (d) A certificate, sworn to or affirmed by a technician employed by 13 the county in which the charged violation occurred or its vendor or 14 contractor, or a facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of photo- 15 graphs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded images produced by 16 a photo speed violation monitoring system, shall be prima facie evidence 17 of the facts contained therein. Any photographs, microphotographs, vide- 18 otape or other recorded images evidencing such a violation shall be 19 available for inspection in any proceeding to adjudicate the liability 20 for such violation pursuant to this section. 21 (e) An owner liable for a violation of subdivision (c) or (d) of 22 section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to a demon- 23 stration program established pursuant to this section shall be liable 24 for monetary penalties in accordance with a schedule of fines and penal- 25 ties promulgated by the parking violations bureau of such county; 26 provided, however, that the monetary penalty for driving at a speed in 27 excess of the maximum speed limit by ten or more miles per hour and less 28 than thirty miles per hour shall not exceed fifty dollars, and the mone- 29 tary penalty for driving in excess of the maximum speed limit by thirty 30 or more miles per hour shall not exceed one hundred dollars; provided, 31 further, that an owner shall be liable for an additional penalty not to 32 exceed twenty-five dollars for each violation for the failure to respond 33 to a notice of liability within the prescribed time period. Notwith- 34 standing any inconsistent provisions of law to the contrary, all reven- 35 ues from the program established pursuant to this section shall be dedi- 36 cated to law enforcement purposes within the village of Quogue. 37 (f) An imposition of liability pursuant to this section shall not be 38 deemed a conviction as an operator and shall not be made part of the 39 operating record of the person upon whom such liability is imposed nor 40 shall it be used for insurance purposes in the provision of motor vehi- 41 cle insurance coverage. 42 (g) 1. A notice of liability shall be sent by first class mail to each 43 person alleged to be liable as an owner for a violation of subdivision 44 (c) or (d) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to 45 this section, within fourteen business days if such owner is a resident 46 of this state and within forty-five business days if such owner is a 47 non-resident. Personal delivery on the owner shall not be required. A 48 manual or automatic record of mailing prepared in the ordinary course of 49 business shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein. 50 2. A notice of liability shall contain the name and address of the 51 person alleged to be liable as an owner for a violation of subdivision 52 (c) or (d) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to 53 this section, the registration number of the vehicle involved in such 54 violation, the location where such violation took place, the date and 55 time of such violation, the identification number of the camera which 56 recorded the violation or other document locator number, at least two A. 8506--A 5 1 date and time stamped images of the rear of the motor vehicle that 2 include the same stationary object near the motor vehicle, and the 3 certificate charging the liability. 4 3. The notice of liability shall contain information advising the 5 person charged of the manner and the time in which the person may 6 contest the liability alleged in the notice. Such notice of liability 7 shall also contain a prominent warning to advise the person charged that 8 failure to contest in the manner and time provided shall be deemed an 9 admission of liability and that a default judgment may be entered there- 10 on. 11 4. The notice of liability shall be prepared and mailed by the agency 12 or agencies designated by the village authorized to implement a demon- 13 stration program pursuant to this section. 14 (h) If an owner of a vehicle receives a notice of liability pursuant 15 to this section for any time period during which such vehicle was 16 reported to the police department as having been stolen, it shall be a 17 valid defense to an allegation of liability for a violation of subdivi- 18 sion (c) or (d) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article that 19 the vehicle had been reported to the police as stolen prior to the time 20 the violation occurred and had not been recovered by such time. For 21 purposes of asserting the defense provided by this subdivision it shall 22 be sufficient that an original incident form issued by the police on the 23 stolen vehicle be sent by first class mail to the justice court of said 24 village. 25 (i) 1. An owner who is a lessor of a vehicle to which a notice of 26 liability was issued pursuant to subdivision (g) of this section shall 27 not be liable for the violation of subdivision (c) or (d) of section 28 eleven hundred eighty of this article, provided that: 29 (i) prior to the violation, the lessor has filed with such village in 30 accordance with the provisions of section two hundred thirty-nine of 31 this chapter; and 32 (ii) within thirty-seven days after receiving notice from such village 33 of the date and time of a liability, together with the other information 34 contained in the original notice of liability, the lessor submits to 35 such court the correct name and address of the lessee of the vehicle 36 identified in the notice of liability at the time of such violation, 37 together with such other additional information contained in the rental, 38 lease or other contract document, as may be reasonably required by such 39 bureau pursuant to regulations that may be promulgated for such purpose. 40 2. Failure to comply with subparagraph (ii) of paragraph one of this 41 subdivision shall render the owner liable for the penalty prescribed in 42 this section. 43 3. Where the lessor complies with the provisions of paragraph one of 44 this subdivision, the lessee of such vehicle on the date of such 45 violation shall be deemed to be the owner of such vehicle for purposes 46 of this section, shall be subject to liability for such violation pursu- 47 ant to this section and shall be sent a notice of liability pursuant to 48 subdivision (g) of this section. 49 (j) If the owner liable for a violation of subdivision (c) or (d) of 50 section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to this section 51 was not the operator of the vehicle at the time of the violation, the 52 owner may maintain an action for indemnification against the operator. 53 (k) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the liability 54 of an operator of a vehicle for any violation of subdivision (c) or (d) 55 of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. A. 8506--A 6 1 (l) Where the village of Quogue adopts a demonstration program pursu- 2 ant to subdivision (a) of this section, such village shall submit a 3 report on the results of the use of photo speed violation monitoring 4 systems to the governor, the temporary president of the senate and the 5 speaker of the assembly on or before the first day of June next succeed- 6 ing the effective date of this section and on the same date in each 7 succeeding year in which the demonstration program is operable. Such 8 report shall include, but not be limited to: 9 1. a description of the locations where photo speed violation monitor- 10 ing systems were used; 11 2. the number of violations recorded at each such location and in the 12 aggregate on a daily, weekly and monthly basis; 13 3. the total number of notices of liability issued; 14 4. the number of fines and total amount of fines paid after first 15 notice of liability; 16 5. the number of violations adjudicated and results of such adjudi- 17 cations including breakdowns of dispositions made; 18 6. the total amount of revenue realized by such village; and 19 7. quality of the adjudication process and its results. 20 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 87 of the public officers law is amended 21 by adding a new paragraph (v) to read as follows: 22 (v) are photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded 23 images prepared under the authority of section eleven hundred eighty-h 24 of the vehicle and traffic law. 25 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 26 have become a law and shall expire December 1, 2030 when upon such date 27 the provisions of this act shall be deemed repealed.